test/src/morphology/N-oojka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - о̄йка: # Noun 122 'eng old man/est kahju/fin' - full paradigm
     о̄йка+N+Sg+Nom: о̄йка
     о̄йка+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: о̄йкам
     о̄йка+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: о̄йкан
     о̄йка+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: о̄йкатэ
     о̄йка+N+Du+Nom: о̄йкаг
     о̄йка+N+Pl+Nom: о̄йкат
#
     рума+N+Sg+Nom: рума
     рума+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: румам
     рума+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: руман
     рума+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: руматэ
     рума+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: румаме̄н
     рума+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: руман
     рума+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: руматэ̄н
     рума+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: румав
     рума+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: рума̄н
     рума+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: руманыл

     рума+N+Sg+Loc: румат
     рума+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: румамт
     рума+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: румант
     рума+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: руматэт
     рума+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: румаме̄нт
     рума+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: румант
     рума+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: руматэ̄нт
     рума+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: румавт
     рума+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: рума̄нт
     рума+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: руманылт
     рума+N+Du+Loc: румаг
     рума+N+Du+Loc: румагт
     рума+N+Pl+Nom: румат
     рума+N+Pl+Loc: руматт
